Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 14-150 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma State Board of Career and Technology Education
to be designated the "Apprentice Scholarship Program Revolving
Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall consist of monies appropriated by the
Legislature and private dollars given to the Oklahoma State Board of
Req. No. 11790 Page 1

Care er and Technology Education for the purpose of supporting the
Apprentice Scholarship Program. All monies accruing to the credit
of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended
by the Oklahoma State Board of Career and Technology Education for
the purpose of running and distributing the Apprentice Scholarship
Program described in subsection B of this section. Expenditures
from the fund shall be made on warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed by the Oklahoma State Board of Career
and Technology Education with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. Contingent upon the amount of funds available in the
Apprentice Scholarship Program Revolving Fund, the Oklahoma State
Board of Career and Technology Education shall award one or more
grants annually to support paying the tuition and fees of eligible
high school graduates enrolling in federally approved apprenticeship
programs in technical trades. Eligible students must enroll in
apprenticeship schools that are Joint Apprenticeship & Training
Committees designated programs. The Oklahoma State Board of Career
and Technology Education shall determine the criteria for and
establish a process for the submission of grant applications. The
applications shall be considered on a statewide competitive basis.
The Oklahoma State Board of Career and Technology Education shall
promulgate rules for the implementation of the grants issued
pursuant to this section.
Req. No. 11790 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11790 TKR 01/16/25





















Req. No. 11790 Page 3